Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Article 3. Funeral Directors and Undertakers

Cross references. —

As to the state board of embalming generally, see art. 2 of this chapter.

As to crematories, see art. 4 of this chapter.

For general provisions relating to public health and safety, see title 35.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Funeral homes as private nuisance, 8 ALR4th 324.

§ 33-16-301.
[Repealed.]

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 79, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 37-1217; W.S. 1957, § 33-230; 2006, ch. 114, § 1; repealed by 2014 ch. 31, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 33-16-302.
[Repealed.]

History:

Laws 1939, ch. 79, § 2; C.S. 1939, § 37-1218; W.S. 1957, § 33-231; Laws 1986, ch. 86, § 1; 1995, ch. 195, § 1; repealed by 2014 ch. 31, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 33-16-303.
[Repealed.]

History:

Laws 1939, ch. 79, § 3; C.S. 1945, § 37-1219; W.S. 1957, § 33-232; Laws 1973, ch. 213, § 2; 1975, ch. 31, § 1; 1993, ch. 131, § 1; repealed by 2014 ch. 31, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 33-16-304.
[Repealed.]

History:

Laws 1939, ch. 79, § 4; C.S. 1945, § 37-1220; W.S. 1957, § 33-233; repealed by 2014 ch. 31, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 33-16-305.
[Repealed.]

History:

Laws 1939, ch. 79, § 5; C.S. 1945, § 37-1221; W.S. 1957, § 33-234; Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 1; repealed by 2014 ch. 31, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 33-16-306.
[Repealed.]

History:

Laws 1939, ch. 79, § 6; C.S. 1939, § 37-1222; W.S. 1957, § 33-235; Laws 1969, ch. 156, § 3; 1975, ch. 31, § 1; 1993, ch. 131, § 1; repealed by 2014 ch. 31, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 33-16-307.
[Repealed.]

History:

Laws 1939, ch. 79, § 7; C.S. 1945, § 37-1223; W.S. 1957, § 33-236; repealed by 2014 ch. 31, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 33-16-308.
[Repealed.]

History:

Laws 1939, ch. 79, § 8; C.S. 1945, § 37-1224; W.S. 1957, § 33-237; repealed by 2014 ch. 31, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 33-16-309.
[Repealed.]

History:

Laws 1939, ch. 79, § 9; C.S. 1945, § 37-1225; W.S. 1957, § 33-238; Laws 1975, ch. 31, § 1; 1993, ch. 131, § 1; repealed by 2014 ch. 31, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 33-16-310.
[Repealed.]

History:

Laws 1939, ch. 79, § 10; C.S. 1945, § 37-1226; W.S. 1957, § 33-239; Laws 1973, ch. 70, § 1; 1993, ch. 78, § 1; 1997, ch. 128, § 2; repealed by 2014 ch. 31, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 33-16-311.
[Repealed.]

History:

Laws 1939, ch. 79, § 11; C.S. 1945, § 37-1227; W.S. 1957, § 33-240; 2010, ch. 69, § 207; repealed by 2014 ch. 31, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 33-16-312.
[Repealed.]

History:

Laws 1939, ch. 79, § 12; C.S. 1945, § 37-1228; W.S. 1957, § 33-241; repealed by 2014 ch. 31, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 33-16-313.
[Repealed.]

History:

Laws 1939, ch. 79, § 13; C.S. 1945, § 37-1229; Laws 1957, ch. 244, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 33-242; Laws 1973, ch. 245, § 3; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; repealed by 2014 ch. 31, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 33-16-314.
[Repealed.]

History:

Laws 1939, ch. 79, § 14; C.S. 1945, § 37-1230; W.S. 1957, § 33-243; repealed by 2014 ch. 31, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 33-16-315.
[Repealed.]

History:

Laws 1939, ch. 79, § 15; C.S. 1945, § 37-1231; Laws 1957, ch. 16, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-244; repealed by 2014 ch. 31, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 33-16-316.
[Repealed.]

History:

Laws 1939, ch. 79, § 16; C.S. 1945, § 37-1232; Laws 1957, ch. 44, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-245; repealed by 2014 ch. 31, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 33-16-317.
[Repealed.]

History:

Laws 1939, ch. 79, § 17; C.S. 1945, § 37-1233; W.S. 1957, § 33-246; Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 1; repealed by 2014 ch. 31, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 33-16-318.
[Repealed.]

History:

Laws 2003, ch. 83, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1; repealed by 2014 ch. 31, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.